Tennessee, session 114, SB1391.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Department" means the department of health;
(2) "LEA" has the same meaning as defined in § 49-1-103;
(3) "Medical first responder" means a fire department or emergency
services agency, emergency services personnel, or other person who responds
to calls for emergency medical assistance from a 911 call;
(4) "Private school" has the same meaning as defined in § 49-6-3001;
and
(5) "Public charter school" has the same meaning as defined in § 49-13-
104.
(b) The department shall establish and, by July 1, 2025, administer, a grant
program to reimburse LEAs, public charter schools, private schools, and medical first
responders for the costs of anti-choking devices purchased by the LEA, public charter
school, private school, or medical first responder on or after July 1, 2025.
(c)
(1) Subject to subdivision (c)(2) and appropriations, a grant awarded to:
SB1391
001903
- 1 -

(A) An LEA is the cost to the LEA of purchasing one (1) anti-
choking device for each cafeteria located in each school under the
jurisdiction of the LEA's local board of education;
(B) A public charter school or private school is the cost to the
school of purchasing one (1) anti-choking device for each cafeteria in the
public charter school or private school, as applicable; or
(C) A medical first responder is the cost to the medical first
responder of purchasing one (1) anti-choking device for each vehicle
used by the medical first responder to respond to calls for emergency
medical assistance from a 911 call.
(2) The department shall not award more than five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000) in total grants through the grant program.
(d) By July 31, 2026, and by each July 31 thereafter, the department shall
submit a report to the general assembly regarding the amount of grant funds available in
the grant program for the immediately preceding fiscal year; the number of LEAs, public
charter schools, private schools, and medical first responders that applied for a grant in
the immediately preceding fiscal year; and the number and amounts of grants awarded
pursuant to this section in the immediately preceding fiscal year.
(e) The department shall promulgate rules to effectuate this section, including
rules to establish the types of anti-choking devices that are reimbursable through the
grant program. The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform
Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
(f) This section is repealed on July 1, 2028.
- 2 - 001903

SECTION 2. This act is not an appropriation of funds, and funds must not be obligated
or expended pursuant to this act unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general
appropriations act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 001903